Arkansas, session 2025, HB1777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-27-307 is amended to read as follows:
5-27-307. Sexually grooming a child.
(a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Bribe" means to offer or bestow any property, gift, good,
or service or to withhold any property, gift, good or service with the
purpose of garnering acceptance, cooperation, or compliance; and
(2) “disseminates” "Disseminates" means to allow to view,
expose, furnish, present, sell, or otherwise distribute.
(b) A person commits sexually grooming a child if, he or she knowingly
disseminates to a child thirteen (13) years of age or younger with or without
consideration a visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct
with the purpose to entice, induce, or groom the a child thirteen (13) years
of age or younger to engage in the following with a person:
*CEB176*
04-08-2025 14:12:01 CEB176

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1777
(1) Sexual intercourse;
(2) Sexually explicit conduct; or
(3) Deviate sexual activity in sexual intercourse, sexually
explicit conduct, or deviate sexual activity, he or she:
(1) Disseminates to the child with or without consideration a
visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct; or
(2) Bribes or attempts to bribe the child to participate in
sexual intercourse, sexually explicit conduct, or deviate sexual activity.
(c) Sexually grooming a child is a:
(1) Class D felony if the actor is twenty-one (21) years of age
or older; or
(2) Class A misdemeanor if the actor is younger than twenty-one
(21) years of age.
(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section
that the actor was not more than three (3) years older than the victim.
(e) It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the
actor does not know the age of the child or believes the child is fourteen
(14) years of age or older.

/s/Gazaway
















04-08-2025 14:12:01 CEB176